Wyoming statutes. Title 28 Legislature
Article 6. Select Committee on Tribal Relations

History.

2020 ch. 99, § 1, effective March 13, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 99, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

§ 28-11-601.
Appointment of members; powers and duties.

Not later than March 15 following each general election, a select committee on tribal relations shall be appointed subject to the following:

The president of the senate shall appoint three (3) members of the senate apportioned as nearly as possible to reflect the percentage of the elected membership of the majority and minority parties of the senate, provided not more than two (2) of the members shall be from the same political party. The president of the senate shall designate a co-chairman of the select committee;

The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint three (3) members of the house apportioned as nearly as possible to reflect the percentage of the elected membership of the majority and minority parties of the house, provided not more than two (2) of the members shall be from the same political party. The speaker of the house shall designate a co-chairman of the select committee.

The select committee shall:

Develop knowledge and expertise among its members regarding matters pertaining to Indian tribes in the state and services and needs on the Wind River Indian Reservation. Consideration of the topics in this paragraph shall include health and safety, water, education, transportation, gaming, communications, law enforcement and legal services, infrastructure, land and resources, minerals, revenue, economic development and other issues that are a concern to the residents on and near the Wind River Indian Reservation as approved by management council;

Facilitate and foster communication and robust working relationships among state, tribal, federal and local entities and pursue opportunities for encouraging economic growth, nondiscrimination and wellbeing for residents of Wind River Indian Reservation and neighboring communities;

Develop and introduce legislation as necessary. If any draft legislation developed by the select committee relates to a topic area of a joint interim committee the legislation shall be submitted to the appropriate legislative committee for comment and consideration prior to the joint interim committee’s last scheduled interim meeting.

History.

2020 ch. 99, § 1, effective March 13, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 99, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2020, ch. 99, § 2, provides: “Within thirty (30) days after the effective date of this act the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint members to the select committee on tribal relations in accordance with the requirements of W.S. 28-11-601(a), as created by this act.”